Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2022
Inheritance tax; appraisement; determination and assessment of tax.

When the value of the property has been fixed, as provided in section 77-2020 or 77-2021, the county judge shall determine and assess the tax to which the same is liable.

Laws 1901, c. 54, § 11, p. 418;

Laws 1907, c. 104, § 1, p. 359;

R.S.1913, § 6632;

Laws 1915, c. 113, § 1, p. 262;

C.S.1922, § 6163;

C.S.1929, § 77-2211;

R.S.1943, § 77-2022;

Laws 1951, c. 269, § 2, p. 903.

County court is not bound by report made by appraiser but may take further evidence and enter order determining tax. County of Keith v. Triska, 168 Neb. 1, 95 N.W.2d 350 (1959).

County court can determine tax that is owing. State ex rel. Nebraska State Bar Assn. v. Richards, 165 Neb. 80, 84 N.W.2d 136 (1957).